District of Columbia statutes.
48-842.03

Prohibition on gifts and remuneration.

(a)

A pharmaceutical company shall not offer a gift or remuneration of any kind to a member of a medication advisory committee.

(b)

A member of a medication advisory committee shall not accept a gift or remuneration of any kind from a pharmaceutical company.

(c)

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the offering or acceptance of medication samples to members of a medication advisory committee who are licensed physicians engaged in the practice of medicine.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 303, 55 DCR 1659
This section is referenced in § 48-844.03.